Utah statutes.
31A-25-307.   Delivery by administrator of policies and communications from
insurer.
Any policies, certificates, booklets, termination notices, or other written
communications delivered by the insurer to the administrator for delivery to
its policyholders shall be delivered by the administrator promptly after
receipt of instructions from the insurer to do so.
